Washington statutes.
RCW 5.48.050

Time for appeal extended.

Whenever a lost or destroyed judgment or order is one to which either party has a right to a proceeding in error or of appeal, the time intervening between the filing of the application mentioned in RCW 5.48.030 and the final order of the court thereon shall be excluded in computing the time within which such proceeding or appeal may be taken as provided by law.

[ 1890 p 339 s 5; RRS s 1274.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. RAP 5.2, 18.22.